Nebraska, session 109, LB375.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB375 LB375
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Grocer Reinvestment Option Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Grocer Reinvestment Option Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Grocery store means an establishment that is primarily engaged
in retailing a general line of food, such as canned or frozen foods,
fresh fruits or vegetables, or fresh or prepared meats, fish, or poultry;
(3) New investment means any expense incurred for expanding or
improving access to perishable or nutritious food, including expenses
incurred for any of the following:
(a) Technical assistance to apply for eligible federal funding
opportunities that offer financial assistance to grocery businesses;
(b) Technical assistance to transition from a sole proprietorship to
a cooperative or other multi-owner or community-supported business model;
(c) Purchases of technology that allow increased capacity or
business resilience, including software and hardware related to business
functions, logistics, inventory management temperature monitoring
controls, electronic shelf tags, automated checkout and website design
that enables e-commerce; or
(d) Innovation to increase wholesale purchasing power, including
feasibility studies, technology, and equipment necessary to enable
cooperative purchasing among multiple businesses local to a participating
grocery store; and
(4) Program means the Grocer Reinvestment Option Program created in
section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. (1) The Grocer Reinvestment Option Program is created. The
department shall administer the program.
(2) Any person may apply to the department for a grant under the
program on a form prescribed by the department.
(3) The department shall develop eligibility standards for an
applicant to meet in order to qualify for a grant under the program. At a
-2-

LB375 LB375
2025 2025
minimum, the applicant shall demonstrate the following:
(a) The grocery store is registered and in good standing with the
Secretary of State to do business in Nebraska;
(b) The grocery store is organized as a sole proprietorship,
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, cooperative, or
nonprofit organization;
(c) The level of need in the area to be served;
(d) Any grant received through the program will be used to make a
new investment in an existing grocery store currently domiciled in
Nebraska;
(e) The applicant has the capacity to successfully implement the
project;
(f) The project will be economically self-sustaining; and
(g) The grocery store is located in a city or village with fewer
than forty thousand residents or is located in one of Nebraska's ninety
least populated counties.
(4) When evaluating grant applications under the program, the
department shall give priority to any applicant that can demonstrate the
following:
(a) A commitment to provide matching funds of at least one-half of
the total project cost;
(b) A commitment to accepting benefits under the United States
Department of Agriculture's Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and
Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children;
(c) The grocery store has, at the time of application, ten or fewer
locations of operation; and
(d) Other criteria the department determines to be consistent with
the purposes of the Grocer Reinvestment Option Act.
(5) The department may contract with one or more nonprofit
organizations or community development financial institutions to
administer the program through a public-private partnership.
-3-

LB375 LB375
2025 2025
Sec. 4. (1) The Grocer Reinvestment Option Fund is created. The
department shall administer the fund and shall use the fund for purposes
of carrying out the Grocer Reinvestment Option Act. No more than fifteen
percent of the money in the fund shall be used for the department's
administrative costs.
(2) The fund shall consist of money transferred by the Legislature
and gifts, grants, and private contributions from any source.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate [XXX] dollars
for fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 for purposes of carrying out the
Grocer Reinvestment Option Act.
Sec. 5. The department shall report to the Legislature regarding
the projects funded, the geographic distribution of the projects, the
identity of the applicants, and the new investment that was produced as a
result of the program. The report shall be electronically submitted on or
before October 31, 2025, and on or before October 31 of each year
thereafter.
Sec. 6. (1) Each grant awarded under the program shall be spent
within three years of disbursement.
(2) Any grant money that is disbursed and not spent pursuant to the
Grocer Reinvestment Option Act shall be recouped by the department.
(3) Any money recouped by the department under the Grocer
Reinvestment Option Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the General Fund.
Sec. 7. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Grocer Reinvestment Option Act.
-4-